Nevada, session 83, SB381.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 248 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2, 3 and 4 of this act.
Sec. 2. 1. A sheriff may appoint civil enforcement officers
who are authorized to transact the business described in
subsection 2. A civil enforcement officer must be at least 18 years
of age. The appointment of a civil enforcement officer must not be
construed to confer upon that civil enforcement officer
policymaking authority for the office of the sheriff or the county
by which the sheriff is employed.
2. A civil enforcement officer appointed pursuant to this
section may:
(a) Serve any civil process or post any public notice that the
sheriff is authorized to serve or post, other than a writ of habeas
corpus, including, without limitation, a letter of demand,
summons, complaint, subpoena or eviction notice;
(b) Execute a writ of garnishment; and
(c) Post or enforce an order for removal of a tenant in a
summary eviction action or a writ of restitution.
3. No civil enforcement officer is qualified to act as such
unless he or she has taken an oath to discharge the duties of the
office faithfully and impartially. The oath, together with the
written appointment, must be recorded in the office of the recorder
of the county within which the sheriff legally holds and exercises
office. Revocations of such appointments must be recorded as
provided in this subsection. From the time of the recording of the
appointments or revocations thereof, persons shall be deemed to
have notice of the appointments or revocations.
4. The sheriff may require of his or her civil enforcement
officers such bonds as the sheriff deems proper.
-
*SB381_R1*

– 5 –
5. Nothing in this section shall be construed to confer upon a
civil enforcement officer the powers of a peace officer pursuant to
NRS 289.150 to 289.360, inclusive, or authorize a civil
enforcement officer appointed pursuant to this section to:
(a) Serve any process in a criminal case or a writ of habeas
corpus;
(b) Summon a jury;
(c) Enforce any order other than those described in subsection
2; or
(d) Execute an order of arrest.
Sec. 3. 1. A sheriff may enter into a contract with an
operator of an online auction for real property to sell real property
under execution pursuant to NRS 21.150 by an auction conducted
on the Internet website of the operator or other electronic means.
2. Nothing in this section shall be construed to relieve the
sheriff of any duty to provide notice concerning the sale of such
property pursuant to chapter 21 of NRS or authorize the sheriff to
delegate such duties to the operator of an online auction for real
property.
3. As used in this section, “operator of an online auction for
real property” means a person or entity who is engaged in the
business of holding, conducting or carrying on an auction for real
property by electronic means.
Sec. 4. 1. If, after the receipt of any writ or order that
directs a sheriff to take the property described in the writ or order,
the property, or any part thereof, is concealed in a building or
enclosure, the sheriff shall publicly demand delivery of the
property. If the property is not delivered, the sheriff shall cause the
building or enclosure to be broken open, and take the property
into his or her possession.
2. If necessary to carry out the provisions of this section, the
sheriff may call to his or her aid the power of the county of the
sheriff.
Sec. 5. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 6. Chapter 258 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 7 to 10, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 7. 1. A constable may appoint civil enforcement
officers who are authorized to transact the business described in
subsection 2. A civil enforcement officer must be at least 18 years
of age. The appointment of a civil enforcement officer must not be
construed to confer upon that civil enforcement officer
policymaking authority for the office of the constable or the
county by which the constable is employed.
-
*SB381_R1*

– 6 –
2. A civil enforcement officer appointed pursuant to this
section may:
(a) Serve any civil process or post public notice that the
constable is authorized to serve or post, other than a writ of
habeas corpus, including, without limitation, a letter of demand,
summons, complaint, subpoena or eviction notice;
(b) Execute a writ of garnishment; and
(c) Post or enforce an order for removal of a tenant in a
summary eviction action or a writ of restitution.
3. No civil enforcement officer is qualified to act as such
unless he or she has taken an oath to discharge the duties of the
office faithfully and impartially. The oath, together with the
written appointment, must be recorded in the office of the recorder
of the county within which the constable legally holds and
exercises office. Revocations of such appointments must be
recorded as provided in this subsection. From the time of the
recording of the appointments or revocations thereof, persons
shall be deemed to have notice of the appointments or revocations.
4. A constable is responsible for the compensation of a civil
enforcement officer appointed pursuant to this section and is
responsible on his or her official bonds for all official malfeasance
of the same. A constable may require a civil enforcement officer to
post a bond for the faithful performance of his or her official
duties.
5. Nothing in this section shall be construed to confer upon a
civil enforcement officer the powers of a peace officer pursuant to
NRS 289.150 to 289.360, inclusive, or authorize a civil
enforcement officer appointed pursuant to this section to:
(a) Serve any process in a criminal case or a writ of habeas
corpus;
(b) Summon a jury;
(c) Enforce any order other than those described in subsection
2; or
(d) Execute an order of arrest.
Sec. 8. 1. A constable may enter into a contract with an
operator of an online auction for real property to sell real property
under execution pursuant to NRS 21.150 by an auction conducted
on the Internet website of the operator or other electronic means.
2. Nothing in this section shall be construed to relieve the
constable of any duty to provide notice concerning the sale of such
property pursuant to chapter 21 of NRS or authorize the constable
to delegate such duties to the operator of an online auction for
real property.
3. As used in this section, “operator of an online auction for
real property” means a person or entity who is engaged in the
-
*SB381_R1*

– 7 –
business of holding, conducting or carrying on an auction for real
property by electronic means.
Sec. 9. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 258.070, no
person who works under the direction and supervision of a
constable, including an appointee, employee, contractor or
volunteer of the constable:
1. Has the powers of a peace officer.
2. May, while performing the duties of his or her position or
any other duties of the office of the constable, possess or carry a
firearm, as defined in NRS 202.253, regardless of whether the
person possesses a permit to carry a concealed firearm issued
pursuant to NRS 202.3653 to 202.369, inclusive.
Sec. 10. 1. If, after the receipt of a writ or order that directs
a constable to take the property described in the writ or order, the
property, or any part thereof, is concealed in a building or
enclosure, the constable shall publicly demand delivery of the
property. If the property is not delivered, the constable shall cause
the building or enclosure to be broken open, and take the property
into his or her possession.
2. If necessary to carry out the provisions of this section, the
constable may call to his or her aid the power of the county of the
constable.
Sec. 11. NRS 258.007 is hereby amended to read as follows:
258.007 1. [Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2,
each constable of a township whose population is 15,000 or more or
a township that has within its boundaries a city whose population is
15,000 or more shall become certified by the Peace Officers’
Standards and Training Commission as a category I or category II
peace officer within 1 year after the date on which the constable
commences his or her term of office or appointment unless the
Commission, for good cause shown, grants in writing an extension
of time, which must not exceed 6 months.
2. Any] In a county whose population is 100,000 or more, any
person who is a candidate for the office of constable in a township
whose population is 100,000 or more must be certified by the Peace
Officers’ Standards and Training Commission as a category I or
category II peace officer before filing a declaration of candidacy for
the office. A person who does not comply with the provisions of this
subsection is not eligible to be a candidate for the office of
constable.
[3.] 2. A constable forfeits his or her office and a vacancy is
created which must be filled in accordance with NRS 258.030 if the
constable [:
(a) Does not become certified by the Peace Officers’ Standards
and Training Commission as required pursuant to subsection 1; or
-
*SB381_R1*

– 8 –
(b) Does] does not maintain the certification by the Peace
Officers’ Standards and Training Commission required pursuant to
subsection 1 [or 2] during his or her term of office.
Sec. 12. NRS 258.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
258.010 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 2 and
3:
(a) Constables must be elected by the qualified electors of their
respective townships.
(b) The constables of the several townships of the State must be
chosen at the general election of 1966, and shall enter upon the
duties of their offices on the first Monday of January next
succeeding their election, and hold their offices for the term of 4
years thereafter, until their successors are elected and qualified.
(c) Constables must receive certificates of election from the
boards of county commissioners of their respective counties.
2. In a county which includes only one township, the board of
county commissioners may, by resolution, appoint the sheriff ex
officio constable to serve without additional compensation. The
resolution must not become effective until the completion of the
term of office for which a constable may have been elected.
3. In a county [whose population:
(a) Is less than 700,000,] which includes more than one
township, if the board of county commissioners determines that the
office of constable is not necessary in one or more townships within
the county, it may, by ordinance, abolish the office of constable in
those townships.
[(b) Is 700,000 or more, if the board of county commissioners
determines that the office of constable is not necessary in one or
more townships within the county, it may, by ordinance, abolish the
office in those townships.
] For a township in which the office of constable has been
abolished, the board of county commissioners may, by resolution,
appoint the sheriff ex officio constable to serve without additional
compensation.
Sec. 13. NRS 258.060 is hereby amended to read as follows:
258.060 1. All constables may appoint deputies, who are
authorized to transact all official business pertaining to the office to
the same extent as their principals. A person must not be appointed
as a deputy constable unless the person has been a resident of the
State of Nevada for at least 6 months before the date of the
appointment [. A person who is appointed as a deputy constable in a
township whose population is 15,000 or more or a township that has
within its boundaries a city whose population is 15,000 or more may
not commence employment as a deputy constable until the person]
and is certified by the Peace Officers’ Standards and Training
-
*SB381_R1*

– 9 –
Commission as a category I or category II peace officer. The
appointment of a deputy constable must not be construed to confer
upon that deputy policymaking authority for the office of the county
constable or the county by which the deputy constable is employed.
2. Constables are responsible for the compensation of their
deputies and are responsible on their official bonds for all official
malfeasance or nonfeasance of the same. Bonds for the faithful
performance of their official duties may be required of the deputies
by the constables.
3. If a constable of an office established by the board of county
commissioners as an enterprise fund appoints a deputy, the
compensation of the deputy must be approved by the board of
county commissioners.
4. All appointments of deputies under the provisions of this
section must be in writing and must, together with the oath of office
of the deputies, be filed and recorded within 30 days after the
appointment in a book provided for that purpose in the office of the
recorder of the county within which the constable legally holds and
exercises his or her office. Revocations of such appointments must
also be filed and recorded as provided in this section within 30 days
after the revocation of the appointment. From the time of the filing
of the appointments or revocations therein, persons shall be deemed
to have notice of the same.
Sec. 14. NRS 258.065 is hereby amended to read as follows:
258.065 1. The constable of a township may, subject to the
approval of the board of county commissioners, appoint such
clerical and operational staff as the work of the constable requires.
The compensation of any person so appointed must be fixed by the
board of county commissioners.
2. [A person who is employed as clerical or operational staff of
a constable:
(a) Does not have the powers of a peace officer; and
(b) May not possess a weapon or carry a firearm, regardless of
whether the person possesses a permit to carry a concealed firearm
issued pursuant to NRS 202.3653 to 202.369, inclusive, while
performing the duties of the office of the constable.
3.] The board of county commissioners may appoint for the
constable of a township a reasonable number of clerks. The
compensation of any clerk so appointed must be fixed by the board
of county commissioners.
[4.] 3. A constable’s clerk shall take the constitutional oath of
office and give bond in the sum of $2,000 for the faithful discharge
of the duties of the office, and in the same manner as is or may be
required of other officers of that township and county.
-
*SB381_R1*

– 10 –
[5.] 4. A constable’s clerk shall do all clerical work in
connection with keeping the records and files of the office, and shall
perform such other duties in connection with the office as the
constable shall prescribe.
Sec. 15. NRS 258.070 is hereby amended to read as follows:
258.070 1. Subject to the provisions of subsections 2 and 3,
each constable shall:
(a) Be a peace officer.
(b) Execute the process, writs or warrants of courts of justice,
judicial officers and coroners, when delivered to the constable for
that purpose.
(c) Discharge such other duties as are or may be prescribed by
law.
2. Subject to the provisions of subsection 3, a constable or
deputy constable has the powers of a peace officer:
(a) For the discharge of duties as are or may be prescribed by
law;
(b) For the purpose of arresting a person for a public offense
committed or attempted in the presence of the constable or deputy
constable, if the constable or deputy constable has reasonable cause
to believe that the arrest is necessary to prevent harm to other
persons or the escape of the person who committed or attempted the
public offense; and
(c) In addition to the circumstances described in paragraphs (a)
and (b):
(1) In an area within the limits of an incorporated city, for the
purposes authorized by and with the consent of the chief of police of
the city; and
(2) In an area that is not within the limits of an incorporated
city, for the purposes authorized by and with the consent of the
sheriff of the county.
3. The constable and each deputy constable of a township shall
not carry a firearm in the performance of his or her duties unless:
(a) The constable has adopted a written policy on the use of
deadly force by the constable and each deputy constable; and
(b) The constable and each deputy constable has received
training regarding the policy.
4. A constable or deputy constable authorized to carry a
firearm pursuant to subsection 3 must receive training approved by
the Peace Officers’ Standards and Training Commission in the use
of firearms at least once every 6 months. This training must include
any continuing education that addresses firearms and is required
for a category II peace officer by the standards established by the
Peace Officers’ Standards and Training Commission pursuant to
subsection 2 of NRS 289.510, including, without limitation, any
-
*SB381_R1*

– 11 –
requirements concerning the demonstration of a minimum level of
proficiency in the use of firearms.
5. A constable or deputy constable who wears a uniform in the
performance of his or her duties shall display prominently as part of
that uniform a badge, nameplate or other uniform piece which
clearly displays the name or an identification number of the
constable or deputy constable.
6. Pursuant to the procedures and subject to the limitations set
forth in chapters 482 and 484A to 484E, inclusive, of NRS, a
constable may issue a citation to an owner or driver, as appropriate,
of a vehicle which is located in his or her township at the time the
citation is issued and which is required to be registered in this State
if the constable determines that the vehicle is not properly
registered. Upon the imposition of punishment pursuant to NRS
482.385 on the person to whom the citation is issued, the constable
is entitled to charge and collect a fee of $100 from the person to
whom the citation is issued, which:
(a) Must be collected by a court that imposes punishment
pursuant to NRS 482.385 on behalf of the constable who issued the
citation and forwarded by the court to the constable; and
(b) May be retained by the constable as compensation.
7. If a sheriff or the sheriff’s deputy in any county in this State
arrests a person charged with a criminal offense or in the
commission of an offense, the sheriff or the sheriff’s deputy shall
serve all process, whether mesne or final, and attend the court
executing the order thereof in the prosecution of the person so
arrested, whether in a justice court or a district court, to the
conclusion, and whether the offense is an offense of which a justice
of the peace has jurisdiction, or whether the proceeding is a
preliminary examination or hearing. The sheriff or the sheriff’s
deputy shall collect the same fees and in the same manner therefor
as the constable of the township in which the justice court is held
would receive for the same service.
8. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection or by
specific statute, a constable shall not enforce any writ, warrant or
other order of a court in a criminal case unless the writ, warrant
or order is delivered to the constable for execution by the Attorney
General, a district attorney, a sheriff or other appropriate person.
Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection, a constable may
execute a warrant for arrest which is issued for a failure to appear
if the constable or deputy of the constable previously issued the
citation which is the subject of the case to the person who is the
subject of the warrant.
Sec. 16. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 17. (Deleted by amendment.)
-
*SB381_R1*

– 12 –
Sec. 18. NRS 21.111 is hereby amended to read as follows:
21.111 A constable may perform any of the duties assigned to
a sheriff and has all of the authority granted to a sheriff pursuant to
this chapter with respect to [a] any process, writ [of execution] or
[garnishment.] order in a civil case.
Sec. 19. NRS 21.150 is hereby amended to read as follows:
21.150 1. All sales of property under execution must be made
at auction to the highest bidder between the hours of 9 a.m. and 5
p.m. [All] Except as otherwise provided by subsection 7, sales of
real property must be made at the courthouse of the county in which
the property or some part thereof is situated.
2. After sufficient property has been sold to satisfy the
execution, more property must not be sold.
3. The officer holding the execution and the officer’s deputy
shall not become a purchaser or be interested in any purchase at
such sale.
4. When the sale is of personal property capable of manual
delivery, it shall be in view of those who attend the sale and be sold
in such parcels as are likely to bring the highest price.
5. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 6, when the sale
is of real property and consisting of several known lots or parcels,
they shall be sold separately, or when a portion of such real property
is claimed by a third person and the third party requires it to be sold
separately, such portion shall be thus sold. If the land to be sold
under execution consists of a single parcel, or two or more
contiguous parcels, situated in two or more counties, notice of the
sale must be posted and published in each of such counties, as
provided in this chapter. The judgment debtor, if present at the sale,
may also direct the order in which property, real or personal, shall
be sold. When such property consists of several known lots or
parcels, or of articles which can be sold to advantage separately, the
sheriff shall be bound to follow such directions.
6. The provisions of subsection 5 do not apply to a sale
pursuant to NRS 40.430.
7. If a sheriff or constable enters into a contract with an
operator of an online auction for real property pursuant to section
3 or 8 of this act, respectively, sales of real property conducted
pursuant to this section may be conducted by an auction on the
Internet website of the operator or by other electronic means. As
used in this subsection, “operator of an online auction for real
property” has the meaning ascribed to it in section 3 of this act.
Sec. 20. NRS 31.235 is hereby amended to read as follows:
31.235 A constable may perform any of the duties assigned to
a sheriff and has all of the authority granted to a sheriff pursuant to
-
*SB381_R1*

– 13 –
this chapter with respect to [a] any process, writ [of attachment.] or
order in a civil case.
Sec. 21. NRS 31.260 is hereby amended to read as follows:
31.260 1. The writ of garnishment must:
(a) Be issued by the sheriff.
(b) Contain the name of the court and the names of the parties.
(c) Be directed to the garnishee defendant.
(d) State the name and address of the plaintiff’s attorney, if any,
otherwise the plaintiff’s address.
(e) Require each person the court directs, as garnishees, to
submit to the sheriff an answer to the interrogatories within 20 days
after service of the writ upon the person.
2. The writ of garnishment must also notify the garnishee
defendant that, if the garnishee defendant fails to answer the
interrogatories, a judgment by default will be rendered against the
garnishee defendant for:
(a) The amount demanded in the writ of garnishment or the
value of the property described in the writ, as the case may be; or
(b) If the garnishment is pursuant to NRS 31.291, the amount of
the lien created pursuant to that section,
 which amount or property must be clearly set forth in the writ of
garnishment.
3. Execution on the writ of garnishment may occur only if the
sheriff mails a copy of the writ of garnishment and the writ of
execution with a copy of the notice of execution to the defendant in
the manner and within the time prescribed in NRS 21.076. In the
case of a writ of garnishment that continues for 180 days or until the
amount demanded in the writ is satisfied, a copy of the writ of
execution and the notice of execution need only be mailed once to
the defendant.
Sec. 22. NRS 269.230 is hereby amended to read as follows:
269.230 1. When six or more persons, whether armed or not,
shall be unlawfully or riotously assembled in any town, the sheriff
of the county [and the sheriff’s] or his or her deputies [,] or the
[constable of the town, and the justice of the peace] chief of police
of the city or his or her peace officers, as applicable, shall go
among the persons so assembled, or as near as possible, and shall
command them, in the name of the people of [the United States and]
the State of Nevada, to disperse immediately.
2. If the persons assembled do not immediately disperse, the
[magistrates and] officers shall arrest them, that they be punished
according to law, and for that purpose may command the aid of all
persons present or within the county.
3. If [a magistrate or] an officer, having notice of an unlawful
or riotous assembly, as provided in subsection 1, [neglect] neglects
-
*SB381_R1*

– 14 –
or [refuse] refuses to proceed to the place of assembly, or as near
thereto as the [magistrate or] officer can with safety, and to exercise
the authority with which the [magistrate or] officer is invested for
suppressing the same and arresting the offenders, the [magistrate or]
officer shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor, and shall be
punished accordingly.
Sec. 23. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 24. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 25. NRS 648.014 is hereby amended to read as follows:
648.014 “Process server” means a person, other than a peace
officer of the State of Nevada [,] or a civil enforcement officer who
is appointed pursuant to section 2 or 7 of this act, who engages in
the business of serving legal process within this State.
Sec. 26. The provisions of NRS 354.599 do not apply to any
additional expenses of a local government that are related to the
provisions of this act.
Sec. 27. NRS 31.920, 171.116 and 258.110 are hereby
repealed.
TEXT OF REPEALED SECTIONS
31.920 Sheriff may take concealed property by force after
demand. If the property, or any part thereof, be concealed in a
building or enclosure, the sheriff shall publicly demand its delivery.
If it be not delivered, the sheriff shall cause the building or
enclosure to be broken open, and take the property into the sheriff’s
possession, and, if necessary, the sheriff may call to the sheriff’s aid
the power of the sheriff’s county.
171.116 When magistrate may depute person to act as
constable. A magistrate may depute in writing any suitable and
discreet person to act as constable when no constable is at hand and
the nature of the business requires immediate action.
258.110 Unlawful failure to arrest offender; penalty. Any
constable who willfully refuses to arrest any person charged with a
criminal offense is guilty of a gross misdemeanor and shall be
removed from office.
H
-
*SB381_R1*